Hawaii, session 2026, HB2012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that literacy is a foundational skill essential to academic achievement, workforce readiness, economic mobility, and civic participation. A significant number of students attending public schools receiving federal Title I funding in Hawaii are not reading at grade level, particularly by the end of third grade, increasing the likelihood of long-term educational and economic disparities. The legislature further finds that schools face constraints related to time, staffing, and resources that limit their ability to meet the full range of students' literacy needs.  Community-based and culturally responsive literacy support, when coordinated with schools, has demonstrated effectiveness in improving early reading proficiency and family engagement.  Expanded access to literacy supports outside of regular school hours, including before school, after school, weekends, and summer months, can close opportunity gaps and strengthen family and community capacity. The purpose of this Act is to improve early literacy, reading proficiency, and lifelong educational outcomes by establishing a two-year community literacy labs pilot program in certain underserved and high-need communities. SECTION 2.  (a)  The department of education, in collaboration with the department of human services and community partners, shall establish and implement a two-year community literacy labs pilot program in at least five communities where nearby public schools are receiving federal Title I funding; provided that at least one pilot program is established and implemented in each of the following: (1)  An urban community; (2)  A rural community; and (3)  A county with a population less than five hundred thousand. (b)  The department of education shall prioritize the establishment and implementation of community literacy labs in communities demonstrating the greatest literacy and access needs, including but not limited to communities with: (1)  The highest percentages of students reading below grade level; (2)  The highest concentrations of poverty; (3)  Limited access to libraries, tutoring services, or broadband Internet; (4)  High populations of English language learners or multilingual students; and (5)  Significant numbers of students experiencing housing instability or involvement in the foster care system. (c)  Community literacy labs may be staffed by: (1)  Licensed teachers; (2)  Literacy specialists; (3)  Educational assistants; (4)  Trained tutors or paraprofessionals; (5)  University or community college students enrolled in education-related programs; and (6)  Qualified nonprofit or community-based organization partners. (d) The department of education may partner with: (1)  The public library system; (2)  Universities and community colleges; (3)  Native Hawaiian education organizations; (4)  Immigrant and language-access nonprofit organizations; (5)  Housing authorities and community centers; and (6)  Other public or private entities with expertise in literacy development. (e) The department of education shall submit an interim report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027 and a final report no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. Each report shall include: (1)  The number and geographic distribution of community literacy labs; (2)  Student participation and attendance rates; (3)  Reading proficiency outcomes and growth measures; (4)  Family engagement metrics; (5)  Program expenditures and cost-effectiveness; and (6)  Recommendations, including any proposed legislation, for program improvement or expansion. The final report shall also include a determination of whether the pilot program should be made permanent and expanded statewide. (f)  In addition to state funding, the department of education may leverage federal Title I funds where permissible. (g)  Participation in and access to the community literacy lab pilot program shall be voluntary and provided at no cost to students and families. (h)  For purposes of this Act, "community literacy lab" means a program, facility, or mobile service that provides: (1)  Small‑group or individualized reading instruction; (2)  Evidence‑based literacy interventions aligned with state standards; (3)  Multilingual, culturally responsive, and place‑based instructional materials; (4)  Family literacy workshops and caregiver training; (5)  Digital literacy tools and assistive reading technologies; (6)  The distribution of free books to support home libraries; or (7)  Hawaii-relevant content reflective of local cultures and communities, and operates on a public school campus, in a nearby community location, or through a mobile or pop‑up model to support literacy development for students and families. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of the community literacy lab pilot program and to be used for: (1)  Staffing and professional development; (2)  Instructional materials and books; (3)  Technology, software, and assistive tools; (4)  Facility use, maintenance, and utilities; (5)  Transportation, outreach, and family engagement; and (6)  Program evaluation and data collection. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________